testing/myv-tests.yaml
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсевантькак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетнескак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетневгак
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавантьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьседеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсекскак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсеськак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсентькак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Def.Sg+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьседентькак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсевантькак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнескак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетневгак
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: псакавтомонтьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьседеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсеськак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Def.Sg+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьседентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсевантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнескак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетневгак
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: псакашкантьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьседеяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсекскак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Nom.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсеськак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Gen.Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсентькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Def.Sg+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьседентькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ine+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Ela+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Prl+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсевантькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Abe+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Comp+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ine+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ela+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Ill+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнескак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Prl+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Tra+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Lat+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетневгак
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Abe+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Comp+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Tra+Def.Sg+Der/SOD+Pl+Def.Pl+Com+Der/Гак+Clt: псакаксонтьсетненеккак
